apertium-eu-hu.eu.twol
!! =================================== !
!! The Basque  morphophonological file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n ñ o p q r s t u v w x y z
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N Ñ O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 

 %>:0 %{t%}:t 
 
 ;

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u;

 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ;
 
 Nas = m n ;
 NonNas = b c d f g h j k l p q r s t v w x z ;

Rules


"ae -> e"
 a:0 <=> _ %>: e ;
 
!"Final r deletion"
! r:0 <=> r _ #: ; 

!etorr#
!etor0#  


!"r doubling"
! 0:r <=> r %>: _ Vow ;
  
!"cons + k -> cons +ek"
! %>:e <=> Cns: _ k ; 

!"r + k -> r r +ek"
! %>:r <=> r: _ 0:e k ; 
 
!"T + s or x or z + t -> s or x or z + t"
! T:0 _ s %> t  ;
!big T is deleted if followed by a t as in aberaTs 

"remove t"
%{t%}:0 <=> _ [ s | x ] %>: t ;

"remove z"
z:0 <=> [ n | x | s | z ] %>: t _ e ;

!abera{t}s>tze
!aberastze


!^Z:0 <=> ^N %> t _ e ;
!^N:0 <=> _ %> t ;
